Hawaii statutes.
§672E-4 Rejection of claim; opportunity to
repair construction defect. (a) The contractor rejects a claimant's claim
of construction defects by:

(1) Serving the claimant with a written rejection of
the claim; or

(2) Failing to respond pursuant to subsection (b)(1)
or (b)(2), to the notice of claim within thirty days after service.

(b) The contractor, within thirty days after
service of the notice of claim, shall serve the claimant and any other
contractor that has received the notice of claim with a written response to the
alleged construction defect that:

(1) Offers to settle without inspecting the
construction defect by:

(A) Monetary payment;

(B) Making repairs; or

(C) Both subparagraphs (A) and (B); or

(2) Proposes to inspect the premises of the alleged
construction defect that is the subject of the claim.

(c) Within thirty days following any proposal
for inspection under subsection (b)(2), the claimant shall provide access to:

(1) Inspect the premises;

(2) Document any alleged construction defects; and

(3) Perform any testing required to evaluate the
nature, extent, and cause of the asserted construction defect, and the nature
and extent of any repair or replacement that may be necessary to remedy the
asserted construction defect;

provided that if the claimant is an association of
owners under chapter 514A or 514B, the claimant shall have forty-five days to
provide such access. If access to an individual condominium apartment or unit
is necessary, and the association is unable to obtain such access, then the
association shall have a reasonable time to provide access. If destructive
testing is required, the contractor shall give advance notice of tests and
return the premises to its pre-testing condition. If inspection or testing reveals
a condition that requires additional testing to fully and completely evaluate
the nature, cause, and extent of the construction defect, the contractor shall
provide notice to the claimant of the need for additional testing. The
claimant shall provide additional access to the premises. If a claim is
asserted on behalf of owners of multiple dwellings, or multiple owners of units
within a multi-family complex, the contractor shall be entitled to inspect each
of the dwellings or units.

(d) Within fourteen days following the
inspection and testing, the contractor shall serve on the claimant a written:

(1) Offer to fully or partially remedy the
construction defect at no cost to the claimant. Such offer shall include a
description of construction necessary to remedy the construction defect and a
timetable for the completion of the additional construction;

(2) Offer to settle the claim by monetary payment;

(3) Offer for a combination of repairs and monetary
payment; or

(4) Statement that the contractor will not proceed
further to remedy the construction defect.

Any offer of settlement under this section shall
reference this section, and shall state that a claimant's failure to respond
with a written notice of acceptance or rejection within thirty or forty-five
days, whichever applies pursuant to section 672E-5(a), shall mean that the
offer is rejected. Failure to serve a written offer or statement under this
section shall be deemed a statement that the contractor will not proceed
further. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 28, §40]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next